Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,119.03
Disclosure of election to be taxed as retailer; authorized.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Tax Commissioner or any employee of the Department of Revenue may disclose the election of another person made pursuant to section 77-2701.10.

Laws 1989, LB 762, § 8;

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 63;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 79.